Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2121
Real property; temporary operation, when.

An authority may temporarily operate and maintain real property in a redevelopment project area pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment, without regard to the provisions of sections 18-2118 and 18-2119, for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the redevelopment plan.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 7(4), p. 810;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1621;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2621.